Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB82.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1414.13. School Bus Driver Epinephrine Auto-injector Training Grant Program.--(a) A school entity may require a driver of a school bus or school vehicle who is employed by, or under a contract with, a school entity to transport students to complete training for the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector under section 1414.9(2) prior to transporting students.(b) The School Bus Driver Epinephrine Auto-injector Training Grant Program is established within the department for the 123456789101112131415161718192021 purpose of providing school entities with funding to raise awareness and train drivers of a school bus or school vehicle to recognize signs and symptoms of severe allergic reactions, including anaphylaxis, and to administer an epinephrine auto-injector.(c) The department shall:(1) Administer the program and, in its sole discretion, establish eligibility criteria and award grants to eligible school entities that submit a completed application.(2) Provide notice of the program to school entities.(3) Develop an application form that school entities may use to apply for a grant under the program.(d) A school entity that exercises the authority under subsection (a) may apply for a grant under subsection (b).(e) The grant shall be used by the school entity to fund the establishment and implementation of a school bus driver epinephrine auto-injector training program.(f) Application must be made to the department in a form and time as the secretary may prescribe.(g) The department shall use money appropriated for the purpose of the program and may accept funding from public and private sources, including the Federal Government, for the payment of grants under this section.(h) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to supersede or preempt any provision of a collective bargaining agreement entered into between a school entity and an exclusive representative of employes of the school entity in accordance with the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the "Public Employe Relations Act," which agreement is in effect on the effective date of this section.20250HB0082PN0066 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) In carrying out its powers and duties under this section, a school entity shall:(1) Comply with Federal and State student record confidentiality laws and regulations, but may, with the consent of a student's parent or legal guardian, disclose to the driver of a school bus or school vehicle information about the student's known allergy or that the student carries an epinephrine auto-injector.(2) Ensure that a driver of a school bus or school vehicle has a clear understanding of Federal and State laws that protect the privacy and confidentiality of student information of students with food allergies.(j) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Program." The School Bus Driver Epinephrine Auto-injector Training Grant Program established in subsection (b)."School bus." A school bus as defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."School entity." A school district, charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school, private academic school or nonpublic school operating within this Commonwealth."School vehicle." A school vehicle as defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102."Secretary." The Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0082PN0066 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728